Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2102
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature that all contractors doing business in Nebraska be registered with the department. It is not the intent of the Legislature to endorse the quality or performance of services provided by any individual contractor.

Laws 1994, LB 248, § 2;

Laws 2008, LB204, § 1.